Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3937.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PEOPLE SERVING PEOPLE.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to People Serving People in Minneapolis to provide preemployment and job readiness services for parents and adults experiencing homelessness. Money may be used for resume and cover letter writing support, job search and application assistance, mock interviews, interview and work clothing, uniform and licensure fee assistance, technology access, financial fitness classes, and child care and transportation support to help families overcome barriers to employment, achieve financial stability, and build pathways to long-term self-sufficiency. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end